Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 4

Powers and Duties

16-15-401. General powers.

Each general sessions court judge is vested with power to:

Grant writs of attachment, returnable to the circuit court, in the same manner and to the same extent as the circuit judge;

Enter up judgment by confession of a defendant to any amount within the judge's jurisdiction in the particular case;

Issue an execution in the judge's county upon a certified execution from another county;

Issue a subpoena for witnesses, in any matter to be tried before the judge, to the judge's own or an adjoining county;

Issue scire facias to revive judgments against the personal representatives and heirs of deceased parties, to any county in the state;

Issue alias and pluries executions whenever necessary;

Issue counterpart writs to any county in the state for the principal maker of any bill, bond, or note, at the instance of the surety or endorser who is sued thereon; and

Punish persons disturbing them in the discharge of their official duties.

Judges of general sessions courts have the same authority as circuit court judges or chancellors to grant fiats for writs of injunction, attachments and other extraordinary process. They also have the same jurisdiction relative to the suspension and revocation of sentences imposed by them as that conferred upon all trial judges by title 40, chapter 29.

The judges of courts of general sessions of counties of the third class, as defined in § 16-15-204 [repealed], having a population of not less than forty-seven thousand eight hundred fifty (47,850) nor more than forty-seven thousand eight hundred seventy-five (47,875), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, in addition to the jurisdiction and powers conferred elsewhere in this chapter, have the authority to sit by interchange for the county judge in nonsupport, probate, juvenile and lunacy proceedings.

Code 1858, § 4125 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 19; 1801, ch. 7, § 4; 1805, ch. 66, §§ 4, 6; 1837-1838, ch. 102, § 1; 1843-1844, ch. 112, § 1; 1847-1848, ch. 55, § 15; 1849-1850, ch. 103, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 181, § 3); Shan., § 5937; Code 1932, § 10138; Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 2; 1961, ch. 138, § 1; 1965, ch. 114, § 1; 1967, ch. 276, § 1; 1968, ch. 635, § 2; 1969, ch. 44, § 2; 1973, ch. 88, § 2; 1973, ch. 355, § 2; 1974, ch. 432, § 2; impl. am. 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; modified; T.C.A., § 19-202; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 16-1104; Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-204, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 2.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Compensation and qualifications of judges, jurisdiction, title 16, ch. 15, part 50.

Power to grant certiorari and supersedeas, § 27-8-105.

Process to other counties, §§ 20-2-107, 20-2-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.12.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 13, 21, 35; 25 Tenn. Juris., Weapons, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Attorney General Opinions. A general sessions court that revokes a defendant’s probation has authority under T.C.A. § 40-35-308(c) to extend the probationary period for up to two years. OAG 15-79, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 80 (12/15/2015).

Cited: Rhinehart v. State, 121 Tenn. 420, 117 S.W. 508, 1908 Tenn. LEXIS 28 (1908); Benson v. Herbst, 240 S.W.3d 235, 2007 Tenn. App. LEXIS 317 (Tenn. Ct. App. May 18, 2007).

16-15-402. General duties.

It is the duty of a general sessions court judge:

To return all marriage licenses under which the judge has solemnized the rites of matrimony to the office of the county clerk within thirty (30) days;

To deliver over, in case of resignation, removal, or expiration of the judge's term of office, all the judge's official books and papers, according to law; and

Not to sign a warrant or summons or any other leading process, attachment or document until written out in full.

Code 1858, § 4126 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 66, § 1; 1809 (Sept.), ch. 63, § 2; 1829, ch. 125, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 17, §§ 7, 13-15); Acts 1889, ch. 251, §§ 1, 2; Shan., § 5938; mod. Code 1932, § 10139; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-203; Acts 1993, ch. 241, §§ 10, 11.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 9, 26, 32.

Law Reviews.

General Sessions Courts: Origin and Recent Legislation (Paul M. Bryan and Isadore B. Baer), 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 667.

Cited: United States ex rel. Watts v. Lauderdale County Justices, 10 F. 460, 1882 U.S. App. LEXIS 2302 (C.C.D. Tenn. 1882); Rowland v. Quarles, 20 Tenn. App. 470, 100 S.W.2d 991, 1936 Tenn. App. LEXIS 38 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1936); State v. McClintock, 732 S.W.2d 268, 1987 Tenn. LEXIS 1063 (Tenn. 1987).

16-15-403. Conservator of peace — Oaths.

Every general sessions court judge is a conservator of the peace in the county in which the judge serves, and has authority to administer oaths when required by law, unless the power is expressly entrusted to some other officer, and to exercise such other powers as are conferred upon the general sessions court judge by law.

Code 1858, § 343; Shan., § 432; Code 1932, § 679; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 28; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 9.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Attorney General Opinions. General authority of judges of general sessions to administer oaths is not limited by T.C.A. §§ 8-18-107, 8-18-109(b) or 17-1-105, OAG 03-043 (4/15/03).

16-15-404. Hearing causes at any time.

Each general sessions court judge is authorized to try any cause that may be brought before the judge at any time and at any place within the county, unless expressly prohibited by some positive provision of this code.

Code 1858, § 4128 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 3); Shan., § 5940; Code 1932, § 10141; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 19-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 13, 24.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 7.1.

Cited: Glenn v. Payne, 153 Tenn. 240, 280 S.W. 1019, 1925 Tenn. LEXIS 24 (1926).

16-15-405. Relief from firearm disabilities imposed on persons adjudicated as mental defective or judicially committed to mental institution.

A person who is subject to 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4) because the person has been adjudicated as a mental defective or judicially committed to a mental institution, as defined in § 16-15-303, may petition the general sessions court that entered the judicial commitment or adjudication order for relief from the firearm disabilities imposed by the adjudication or judicial commitment; provided, that the person may not petition the court until three (3) years from the date of release from commitment or the date of the adjudication order, whichever is later.

A copy of the petition for relief shall also be served on the district attorney general of the judicial district in which the original judicial commitment or adjudication occurred. The district attorney general may appear, support, object to, or present evidence relevant to the relief sought by the petitioner.

The court shall receive and consider evidence in an open proceeding, including evidence offered by the petitioner, concerning:

The circumstances that led to the imposition of the firearms disability under 18 U.S.C. § 922(d)(4) and (g)(4);

The petitioner's mental health records;

The petitioner's criminal history;

The petitioner's reputation; and

Changes in the petitioner's condition or circumstances relevant to the relief sought.

The court shall grant the petition for relief if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence and enters into the record the following:

The petitioner is no longer likely to act in a manner that is dangerous to public safety; and

Granting the relief would not be contrary to the public interest.

A record of the proceedings, to be provided by the petitioner, shall be made by a certified court reporter or by court-approved electronic means.

The petitioner may appeal a final order denying the requested relief, and the review on appeal, if granted, shall be de novo.

A person may file a petition for relief under this section no more than once every two (2) years.

Relief from a firearm disability granted under this section has no effect on the loss of civil rights, including firearm rights, for any reason other than the particular adjudication as a mental defective or judicial commitment to a mental institution from which relief is granted.

When the court issues an order granting a petition of relief under subsection (d), the court clerk shall, as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after issuance, forward a copy of the order to the Tennessee bureau of investigation (TBI). The TBI, upon receipt of the order, shall:

Immediately forward a copy of the order to the department of safety;

Update the National Instant Criminal Background Check System database and transmit the corrected records to the federal bureau of investigation; and

Remove and destroy all records relating to the petition for relief from any database over which the TBI exercises control.

The TBI and the department of safety shall not use or permit the use of the records or information obtained or retained pursuant to this section for any purpose not specified in this section.

Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-15-405 (Code 1858, §§ 4129-4134 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 7); Shan., §§ 5941-5946; Code 1932, §§ 10142-10147; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 19-206 — 19-209; Acts 1984, ch. 772, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning dockets to be kept by general sessions court judges, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 12.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 459, § 6. July 1, 2015.

16-15-406. Rules of court.

Judges of the courts of general sessions shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to expedite the trial and disposal of cases.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 7; T.C.A., § 16-1120.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Attorney General Opinions. County courthouse security and dress rules. OAG 12-107, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (11/26/12).